Alabama, session 2026rs, HB598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Rural
Maternal and Infant Health Equity Act.
Section 2. As used in this act, unless otherwise
Page 1

Section 2. As used in this act, unless otherwise
HB598 INTRODUCED
specified or unless the context requires otherwise, the
following terms will have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
Health.
(2) DOULA. A trained, nonclinical birth support
professional who provides physical, emotional, and
informational assistance.
(3) MIDWIFE. A certified nurse-midwife, certified
professional midwife, or other licensed midwifery provider
licensed by the State Board of Midwifery.
(4) RURAL AREA. Any area within this state not included
within the boundaries of any incorporated city or town having
a population in excess of 25,000 inhabitants, according to the
last federal decennial census.
Section 3. (a) The department shall support rural
access to midwifery and doula services by offering grants to
integrate maternity care providers into hospitals and clinics.
(b) The State Board of Midwifery shall license and
regulate community-based maternity care providers.
(c) Cultural competency and evidence-based training
shall be required.
Section 4. (a) Subject to prior approval or a waiver
from the Centers of Medicare and Medicaid Services, the
Alabama Medicaid Agency shall provide coverage for midwife and
doula services.
(b) Every insurer authorized to offer, sell, or deliver
insurance in this state shall include coverage for midwife and
doula services.
Page 2

doula services.
HB598 INTRODUCED
Section 5. (a) The department shall establish the
Obstetric Workforce Training and Incentive Program to support:
(1) Obstetrics and gynecology residencies or rural
clinical rotations;
(2) Recruitment incentives for obstetric providers
locating in rural areas; and
(3) Loan repayment for at least two years of rural
maternity care service.
(b) Priority shall be given to providers trained in
team-based and culturally responsive care.
Section 6. (a) The department shall fund locally led
maternal health partnerships to:
(1) Deliver prenatal home visits by nurses or
midwives;
(2) Complete mobile perinatal clinics; and
(3) Complete group prenatal care and peer-led education
for at-risk populations.
(b) Grantees must demonstrate engagement of target
communities in program design.
Section 7. (a) The department shall offer capital
grants to:
(1) Establish new rural birth centers;
(2) Expand or modernize obstetric units in rural
hospitals; and
(3) Support facilities offering continuous labor
support and postpartum care.
(b) Projects must meet safety and licensure standards.
Section 8. (a) There is created the Rural Maternal and
Page 3

Section 8. (a) There is created the Rural Maternal and
HB598 INTRODUCED
Infant Health Equity Program Fund in the State Treasury.
(b) The fund is subject to appropriations by the
Legislature and gifts, grants, and other donations received by
the department for the programs and grants described in this
act. The department may not spend appropriations for the
program for the purposes other than those listed in this act.
(c) Amounts in the fund shall be budgeted and allotted
in accordance with Sections 41-4-80 through 41-4-69 and
Sections 41-19-1 through 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 9. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4